Maine, session 132, LD1064.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §2916-D is enacted to read:
§2916-D. Automobile insurance cancellation, nonrenewal and certain changes
because of marital status prohibited
An insurance company authorized to transact business in this State may not cancel or
refuse to renew, reduce liability limits for or charge a higher premium for a policy for the
sole reason that a person to whom the policy has been issued has experienced a change in
marital status due to the death of the person's spouse.